District of Columbia statutes.
21-909

Payment of expenses of transfers.

The Superintendent of Saint Elizabeths Hospital may arrange for and pay the expenses of the transfer of a person committed to his custody pursuant to this chapter or admitted to the hospital pursuant to section 21-904 to his relatives or to a hospital in the State of his residence, and, in connection with the transfer, may pay the transportation and expenses of attendants necessary to insure safe travel.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 765, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-909.
1973 Ed., § 21-909.